Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Meetings and Action of Board

48-58-201. Regular and special meetings.

If the time and place of a directors' meeting is fixed by the bylaws or the board, the meeting is a regular meeting. All other meetings are special meetings.

A board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state. Unless the charter or bylaws otherwise provide, special meetings of the board of directors may be called by the presiding officer of the board, the president, or any two (2) directors.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, a board may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.20.

48-58-202. Action without meeting.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by chapters 51-68 of this title to be taken at a board of directors' meeting may be taken without a meeting. If all directors consent to taking such action without a meeting, the affirmative vote of the number of directors that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting is the act of the board. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.21.

48-58-203. Notice of meetings.

Unless the charter, bylaws or subsection (c) provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board may be held without notice.

Unless the charter, bylaws or subsection (c) provide otherwise, special meetings of the board must be preceded by at least two (2) days' notice to each director of the date, time, and place, but not the purpose, of the meeting.

In corporations without members, any board action to remove a director or to approve a matter, which would require approval by the members if the corporation had members, shall not be valid unless each director is given at least seven (7) days' written notice that the matter will be voted upon at a directors' meeting or unless notice is waived pursuant to § 48-58-204.

Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place to which the meeting is adjourned are fixed at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken and if the period of adjournment does not exceed one (1) month in any one (1) adjournment.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.22.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-2005, 5-2105, 5-2201, 5-2302, 5-2601, 5-2602.

48-58-204. Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided in subsection (b), the waiver must be in the form of a document, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or the corporate records.

A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director's arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.23; 2014, ch. 899, § 33.

48-58-205. Quorum and voting.

Except as otherwise provided in chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter or bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in office immediately before a meeting begins. In no event may the charter or bylaws authorize a quorum of fewer than the greater of one third (1/3) of the number of directors in office or two (2) directors. When a quorum is once present to organize a meeting, a meeting may be later adjourned despite the absence of a quorum caused by the subsequent withdrawal of any of those present.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board unless chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director's arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

The director's dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director delivers notice in the form of a document of the director's dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.24; 2014, ch. 899, § 34.

Law Reviews.

Why a Board? Group Decisionmaking in Corporate Governance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

48-58-206. Committees.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees of the board. A committee may consist of one (1) natural person. Except as provided in § 48-58-703, members of committees of the board of directors may be members of the board of directors or other natural persons, and they shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it must be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the charter or bylaws to take action under § 48-58-205.

Sections 48-58-201 — 48-58-205, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the charter or bylaws, each committee of the board may exercise the board's authority under § 48-58-101.

A committee may not, however:

Authorize distributions;

Approve or recommend to members dissolution, merger or the sale, pledge or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation's assets;

Elect, appoint or remove directors or fill vacancies on the board or on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend or repeal the charter or bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in § 48-58-301.

The board of directors may appoint one (1) or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified committee member during the member's absence or disqualification.

The corporation may create or authorize the creation of one (1) or more advisory committees whose members need not be directors. An advisory committee is not a committee of the board and may not exercise any of the powers of the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.25; 2014, ch. 899, §§ 35, 36.